pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Preparação para emergências: Alarmes de terremoto; Cobertores térmicos; Kits de alimentação de emergência; Ferramentas de emergência e kits de primeiros socorros; Recipientes para armazenamento de água de emergência; Escadas de incêndio; Buchas para móveis
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 防災用品: 地震警報機; 非常用毛布; 非常食セット; 非常用品; 非常用貯水容器; 火災用避難はしご; 家具転倒防止器具
es: Casa y jardín > Preparación en caso de emergencias: Alarmas para terremotos; Mantas de emergencia; Kits de comida para emergencias; Kits y herramientas de emergencia; Contenedores de almacenamiento de agua de emergencia; Escaleras de escape de incendios; Fijaciones para muebles
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 緊急逃生工具: 地震警報器; 緊急防寒毯; 緊急食物包; 急救工具/急救箱; 應急儲水容器; 消防逃生梯; 家具固定器
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Готовност при извънредни ситуации: Аларми за земетресение; Термо одеяла; Хранителни комплекти за спешна помощ; Инструменти и комплекти за спешни случаи; Контейнери за съхранение на вода за спешни случаи; Пожарни стълби; Анкери за мебели
cs: Dům a zahrada > Připravenost na mimořádné události: Výstražné systémy před zemětřesením; Nouzové přikrývky; Potraviny pro nouzové situace; Nástroje a sady pro nouzové situace; Nouzové zásobníky vody; Požární únikové žebříky; Nábytkové kotvy
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Načrtovanje za nujne primere: Alarmi za potres; Odeje za nujne primere; Kompleti hrane za nujne primere; Orodja in kompleti za nujne primere; Posode za shranjevanje vode v nujnih primerih; Požarne lestve; Sidra za pohištvo
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sẵn sàng cho trường hợp khẩn cấp: Cảnh báo động đất; Chăn dùng trong trường hợp khẩn cấp; Bộ thực phẩm khẩn cấp; Bộ dụng cụ cho tình huống khẩn cấp; Thùng Chứa Nước Khẩn Cấp; Thang Thoát Hiểm; Neo đồ đạc
nl: Huis en tuin > Voorbereiding op noodgevallen: Aardbevingsalarmen; Reddingsdekens; Noodrantsoenen; Noodgereedschap en -sets; Wateropslagcontainers voor noodgevallen; Brandtrappen; Meubelankers
th: บ้านและสวน > การเตรียมพร้อมสำหรับกรณีฉุกเฉิน: ตัวแจ้งเตือนแผ่นดินไหว; ผ้าห่มฉุกเฉิน; ชุดอาหารสำหรับกรณีฉุกเฉิน; ชุดและเครื่องมือสำหรับกรณีฉุกเฉิน; ภาชนะเก็บน้ำฉุกเฉิน; บันไดหนีไฟ; ที่ยึดเฟอร์นิเจอร์
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Pregătire pentru situații de urgență: Alarme de cutremur; Pături pentru situații de urgență; Seturi cu alimente pentru situații de urgență; Unelte și truse pentru situații de urgență; Recipient de stocare de urgență a apei; Scări de evacuare în caz de incendiu; Ancore pentru mobilier
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 위급상황 대비: 지진 경보기; 응급용 담요; 비상 식량 키트; 구급 용품/키트; 비상용 물 저장 컨테이너; 비상 탈출 사다리; 가구 고정 장치
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 应急准备: 地震报警器; 应急毯; 应急食品包; 应急工具/工具包; 应急储水容器; 消防逃生梯; 家具固定器具
it: Casa e giardino > Preparazione alle emergenze: Sistemi allarme terremoto; Coperte termiche; Razioni alimentari di emergenza; Attrezzi e kit di emergenza; Cassa di accumulo di acqua di emergenza; Scale antincendio; Fissaggi per mobili
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Pripravenosť v prípade núdzovej situácie: Hlásiče zemetrasenia; Núdzové deky; Núdzové potravinové súpravy; Núdzové nástroje a súpravy; Núdzové nádoby na vodu; Požiarne rebríky; Kotvy na nábytok
en: Home & Garden > Emergency Preparedness: Earthquake Alarms; Emergency Blankets; Emergency Food Kits; Emergency Tools & Kits; Emergency Water Storage Containers; Fire Escape Ladders; Furniture Anchors
pl: Dom i ogród > Przygotowanie na sytuacje kryzysowe: Alarmy o trzęsieniu ziemi; Koce ratunkowe; Racje żywnościowe; Zestawy ratunkowe; Pojemniki na wodę awaryjną; Drabiny ewakuacyjne; Kątowniki do mebli
nb: Hjem og hage > Nødforberedelser: Jordskjelvalarmer; Nødtepper; Nødmatsett; Nødverktøy og -sett; Nødvannbeholdere; Brannstiger; Møbelankre
da: Hjem og have > Sikkerhedsforanstaltninger: Jordskælvsalarmer; Nødtæpper; Nødforsyninger; Førstehjælpsudstyr; Nødopbevaring af vand; Brandstiger; Møbelforankring
sv: Hem och trädgård > Beredskapsplaner: Jordbävningslarm; Nödfiltar; Nödproviant; Verktyg och kit för nödlägen; Förvaringsbehållare för vatten i nödsituationer; Brandstegar; Möbelankare
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Preparação de emergência: Alarmes de terramotos; Cobertores de emergência; Kits de comida de emergência; Kits e ferramentas de emergência; Recipientes de armazenamento de água de emergência; Escadas de incêndio; Âncoras de mobiliário
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Pasirengimas ekstremalioms situacijoms: Žemės drebėjimo aliarmai; Gelbėjimo antklodės; Maisto rinkiniai ekstremalioms situacijoms; Įrankiai ir rinkiniai ekstremalioms situacijoms; Avariniai vandens kaupimo konteineriai; Priešgaisrinės kopėčios; Baldų inkarai
de: Heim & Garten > Notfallvorsorge: Erdbebenmelder; Notfalldecken; Notvorräte; Notfallwerkzeuge; Notfall-Wasserbehälter; Feuerleitern; Möbelanker
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Pripravnost za hitne slučajeve: Alarmi za potres; Pokrivači za hitne slučajeve; Kompleti hrane za hitne slučajeve; Alati i oprema za hitne slučajeve; Spremnici za vodu za hitne slučajeve; Ljestve za evakuaciju u slučaju požara; Sidra za namještaj
ru: Дом и сад > Готовность к чрезвычайным ситуациям: Системы оповещения о землетрясениях; Спасательные одеяла; Наборы продовольствия на случай ЧС; Аварийные инструменты и наборы; Контейнер для аварийного хранения воды; Пожарные лестницы; Фиксаторы для мебели
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Προετοιμασία για καταστάσεις έκτακτης ανάγκης: Συναγερμοί σεισμού; Κουβέρτες έκτακτης ανάγκης; Κιτ τροφίμων έκτακτης ανάγκης; Εργαλεία & κιτ έκτακτης ανάγκης; Δοχεία αποθήκευσης νερού έκτακτης ανάγκης; Σκάλες διαφυγής κινδύνου; Άγκυρες επίπλων
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Hätätilanteisiin varautuminen: Maanjäristysvaroittimet; Hätäpeitteet; Hätäruokapakkaukset; Selviytymisvälineet ja -pakkaukset; Hätävesisäiliöt; Paloportaat; Kalusteiden kiinnitys
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Acil Durum Hazırlığı: Deprem Alarmları; Acil Durum Battaniyeleri; Acil Durum Yiyecek Setleri; Acil Durum Aletleri ve Setleri; Acil Durum Su Depoları; Yangın Kaçış Merdivenleri; Mobilya Sabitleyiciler
hu: Otthon és kert > Vészhelyzeti felkészültség: Földrengés-riasztók; Vészhelyzeti takarók; Vészhelyzeti élelmiszerkészletek; Vészhelyzeti eszközök és készletek; Sürgősségi víztároló tartály; Tűzlépcsők; Bútorhorgonyok
fr: Maison et jardin > Préparation aux situations d’urgence: Détecteurs de tremblements de terre; Couvertures de survie; Packs alimentaires d’urgence; Outils d’urgence; Conteneur de stockage d'eau d'urgence; Échelles de secours; Fixations pour meubles